Hawaii statutes.
§286-224 Inspections. (a) Any
shipment or transport of hazardous materials by motor vehicle in commerce of
which vehicle placarding or a shipping paper or manifest is required by the
hazardous materials regulations adopted by the State, is subject to inspection
by persons appointed by the director of transportation to enforce the safe
transportation of hazardous materials in commerce and by those state and county
officers charged with the enforcement of laws and ordinances adopted pursuant
to this part.

(b) All carriers and persons that use a
highway or street to transport hazardous materials in commerce shall afford the
director of transportation, persons designated by the director, and those
persons designated by the county executive officers, reasonable opportunity to
enter and inspect freight containers, and motor vehicles, to review and
document deficiencies on shipping papers and manifests, and to inspect other
places incidental to the transshipment of hazardous materials by motor carrier
vehicles. [L 1989, c 185, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 134, §5; am L 2000, c 86, §5]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next